New York, session 2025-2026, A1669.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "Myls' law". 2 § 2. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 384-d 3 to read as follows: 4 § 384-d. Care and custody of children in the event of a care-giver's 5 arrest. 1. As used in this section, "arresting authority" refers to all 6 police agencies in the state, including but not limited to all state and 7 municipal police agencies and all peace officers as defined in section 8 2.10 of the criminal procedure law. 9 2. In the event that a person is arrested or taken into custody, the 10 arresting authority shall inquire whether such person is a parent, legal 11 guardian or care-giver of a minor, and the arresting authority shall: 12 (a) ascertain the location of the minor and the identity of any person 13 to whom the parent, legal guardian or care-giver has entrusted the care 14 of the minor; and 15 (b) as soon as practicable, notify the local social services district 16 of the location of the minor and the identity of the person entrusted 17 with the care of the minor. 18 3. Upon receiving notification from an arresting authority pursuant to 19 the provisions of subdivision two of this section, the local social 20 services district shall promptly confirm the location of the minor; 21 contact the person to whom care of the minor has been entrusted by the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03088-01-5 A. 1669 2 1 arrested parent, legal guardian or care-giver and confirm that the minor 2 is with such person. 3 4. (a) Within twenty-four hours of notification, the local social 4 services district shall: 5 (1) commence an investigation into the appropriateness of the place- 6 ment by the arrested parent, legal guardian or care-giver of the minor 7 with the person to whom the arrested parent, legal guardian or care-giv- 8 er has entrusted the care of the minor; 9 (2)(i) commence a search to locate any non-respondent parent of the 10 child or other relatives of the minor, including but not limited to all 11 of the minor's grandparents, and all relatives identified by a minor 12 over the age of five as a relative who plays or has played a significant 13 positive role in the minor's life, and to inform them of the opportunity 14 to seek temporary custody or care of the minor; and (ii) determine 15 whether the minor may appropriately be placed with a suitable person 16 related to the minor and whether such relative is willing to care for 17 such minor and can provide appropriate care for the minor; and 18 (3) determine the location of any minor siblings, half-siblings, step- 19 siblings, foster-siblings, or non-blood related siblings of the minor. 20 (b) Provided, however, that if the local social services district 21 finds that the minor is in the care of a custodial parent or legal guar- 22 dian, not in custody, the investigations required pursuant to this 23 section shall cease. 24 5. The local social services district shall make a determination as to 25 the appropriateness of the placement of the minor by the parent, legal 26 guardian or care-giver that was arrested or taken into custody, within 27 twenty-four hours of notification by the arresting authority. In the 28 event that the placement is found by the local social services district 29 to be contrary to the minor's health, safety or welfare, or otherwise 30 not in the best interests of the minor, the local social services 31 district shall immediately provide or arrange for the provision of care 32 for such minor. 33 6. The local social services district shall remain responsible for 34 monitoring the welfare of any minor subject to the provisions of this 35 section until the local social services district receives notification 36 from the parent, legal guardian or care-giver that such person is no 37 longer under arrest or in custody and that the parent, legal guardian or 38 care-giver requests the immediate return of the minor. Upon receipt of 39 such notification, the local social services district shall return such 40 minor to the parent, legal guardian or care-giver as soon as practicable 41 but no later than ten days of receiving notification, except where a 42 contrary court order has been issued pursuant to part two, five or seven 43 of article ten of the family court act. 44 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 45 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 46 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 47 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 48 on or before such effective date.